Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the home inspector advisory licensing board.

(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(4) "Entity" or "entities" means educational groups or organizations, national organizations or associations, or a national test organization.

(5) "Home inspection" means a professional examination of the current condition of a house.

(6) "Home inspector" means a person who carries out a noninvasive examination of the condition of a home, often in connection with the sale of that home, using special training and education to carry out the inspection.

(7) "Report" means a written report prepared and issued after a home inspection.

(8) "Wood destroying organism" means insects or fungi that consume, excavate, develop in, or otherwise modify the integrity of wood or wood products. "Wood destroying organism" includes but is not limited to carpenter ants, moisture ants, subterranean termites, dampwood termites, beetles in the family Anobiidae, and wood decay fungi, known as wood rot.

[ 2008 c 119 s 1.]